Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2022.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-120, as amended by section 2 of
2025 Senate Bill No. 2, is hereby amended to read as follows: 10-120.
(a) Whenever an election is required for the issuance of bonds for any
purpose by any municipality other than an irrigation district or where a
different procedure for giving notice of the election is specifically
provided by law, upon compliance with the legal requirements
necessary and precedent to the call for the election, the proper
municipal officers shall call an election. The election shall be held
within 60 days after compliance with the necessary requirements, or
within 90 days, should the longer period include the date of a general
election on the date of a general election, primary election or special
election, as defined in K.S.A. 25-2502, and amendments thereto.
(b) Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation in the municipality once each week for two
consecutive weeks and on the website of the county election office of
any county where the election is to be conducted if such county
election office has a website. The first publication shall be not less than
21 days prior to the election. If published on the website of the county
election office, such publication shall remain on the website until the
day after the election. The notice shall set forth the time and place of
holding the election and the purpose for which the bonds are to be
issued and shall be signed by the county election officer. The election
shall be held at the usual place of holding elections and shall be
conducted by the officers or persons provided by law for holding
elections in the municipality.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 25-432 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 25-432. An election shall not be conducted under this act
unless:
(a) Conducted on a date, mutually agreed upon by the governing
body of the political or taxing subdivision and the county election
officer, not later than 120 days following the date the request is
submitted by the political or taxing subdivision;
(b) The secretary of state approves a written plan for conduct of
the election, including, but not limited to, a written timetable for the
conduct of the election, submitted by the county election officer;
(c)(b) the election is nonpartisan;
(d)(c) the election is not one at which any candidate is elected,
retained or recalled;
(e)(d) the election is not held on the same date as another election
in which the qualified electors of that subdivision of government are
eligible to cast ballots, except this restriction shall not apply to mail
ballot elections held under K.S.A. 79-2925c, and amendments thereto,
or elections held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March;
and
(f)(e) the election is a question submitted election at which and all
of the qualified electors of one of the following subdivisions of
government are the only electors eligible to vote on such question:
(1) Counties;
(2) cities;
(3) school districts, except in an election held pursuant to K.S.A.
72-635 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(4) townships;
(5) benefit districts organized under K.S.A. 31-301, and
amendments thereto;
(6) cemetery districts organized under K.S.A. 15-1013 or 17-1330,
and amendments thereto;
(7) community college districts organized under K.S.A. 71-1101 et
seq., and amendments thereto;

HOUSE BILL No. 2022—page 2
(8) fire districts organized under K.S.A. 19-3601 or 80-1512, and
amendments thereto;
(9) hospital districts;
(10) improvement districts organized under K.S.A. 19-2753, and
amendments thereto;
(11) Johnson county park and recreation district organized under
K.S.A. 19-2859, and amendments thereto;
(12) water districts organized under K.S.A. 19-3501 et seq., and
amendments thereto;
(13) transportation development districts created pursuant to
K.S.A. 12-17,140 et seq., and amendments thereto; or
(14) any tract of land annexed pursuant to K.S.A. 12-521, and
amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 25-1115 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 25-1115. (a) "General election" means the elections held on
the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of both even-
numbered and odd-numbered years, and in the case of an election of
any officers to fill vacancies held on a date other than the Tuesday
following the first Monday in November, the election at which any
such officer is finally elected.
(b) "Primary election" means the elections held on the first
Tuesday in August of both even-numbered and odd-numbered years
and any other preliminary election held on a date other than the first
Tuesday in August at which part of the candidates for election to any
national, state, county, city, school or other municipal office are
eliminated by the process of the election but at which no officer is
finally elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election that is not a general or
primary election, including, but not limited to, any mail ballot election
conducted pursuant to K.S.A. 25-431 et seq., and amendments thereto.
A special election shall not be held within 45 days of a general or
primary election but may be held on the same day as a general or
primary election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
March of any year or on the same day as a general or primary election.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 25-2006 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2006. As used in article 20 of chapter 25 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto:
(a) "General election" means the election held for school officers
on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of odd-
numbered years, and in the case of special elections of any school
officers to fill vacancies, the election at which any such officer is
finally elected.
(b) "Primary election" means the election held on the first Tuesday
in August of each odd-numbered year, and any other preliminary
election at which part of the candidates for special election to any
school office are eliminated by the process of the election but at which
no officer is finally elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in March of any year or on the same day as a
general or primary election.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 25-2019 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2019. (a) No school district shall call or hold more than one special
bond election at a time other than on the same date as a primary or
general election, at a special election or the election of board of
education members within any one calendar year; nor shall any special
bond election be held within sixty (60) days before or after a general
election or election of members of the board of education of such
district. The provisions of this act shall not prohibit the planning for or
consideration of any bond election during the period between
authorized bond elections, nor shall this act prohibit notice or other
preparation for election during such period.
(b) The provisions of this act shall have no application to any
capital outlay tax levy or election for authorization thereof. This act
shall apply to every school district offering any of grades one to twelve

HOUSE BILL No. 2022—page 3
and to community junior colleges.
(c) This section shall not apply to bond elections held for the
purpose of replacing, or repairing and equipping school buildings or
facilities destroyed or substantially damaged by fire, windstorm, flood
or other casualty, if approval for such election is obtained from the state
board of education.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 25-2502 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 25-2502.(a) "General election" means the elections held on the
Tuesday following the first Monday in November of both even-
numbered and odd-numbered years, and in the case of an election of
any officers to fill vacancies held on a date other than the Tuesday
following the first Monday in November, the election at which any
such officer is finally elected.
(b) "Primary election" means the elections held on the first
Tuesday in August of both even-numbered and odd-numbered years
and any other preliminary election held on a date other than the first
Tuesday in August at which part of the candidates for election to any
national, state, county, township, city, school or other municipal office
are eliminated by the process of the election but at which no officer is
finally elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election that is not a general or
primary election, including, but not limited to, any mail ballot election
conducted pursuant to K.S.A. 25-431 et seq., and amendments thereto.
A special election shall not be held within 45 days of a general or
primary election but may be held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in March of any year or on the same day as a general or
primary election.

HOUSE BILL No. 2022—page 4
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 25-2006 and 25-2019 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-
120, as amended by section 2 of 2025 Senate Bill No. 2, 25-432, 25-
1115 and 25-2502 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 8. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.